Ohio, session 136, HB388.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 124.826 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 124.826. (A) As used in this section : 6
(1) "GLP-1 drug" means a drug included within the class of 7
drugs known as glucagon-like peptide-1 receptor agonists. 8
(2) "Pharmacy" has the same meaning as in section 4729.01 9
of the Revised Code. 10
(3) "Physician" means an individual authorized under 11
Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and 12
surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery. 13
(B) Notwithstanding section 3901.71 of the Revised Code or 14
any other provision of the Revised Code to the contrary, and 15
subject to divisions (C), (D), and (E) of this section, 16
beginning on the effective date of this section, the health care 17
benefits provided under section 124.82 of the Revised Code shall 18
include reimbursements to cover out-of-pocket costs that a state 19

H. B. No. 388 Page 2
As Introduced
employee or elected state official pays to purchase a supply of 20
a GLP-1 drug that meets all of the following conditions: 21
(1) The drug is approved by the federal food and drug 22
administration for chronic weight management. 23
(2) The drug is purchased from a manufacturer's direct-to- 24
consumer program or through a pharmacy or other entity 25
participating in a manufacturer's direct-to-consumer program. 26
(3) The drug is not a compounded version of a GLP-1 drug. 27
(C) Except as provided in division (F) of this section, no 28
employee or official may apply to receive a reimbursement under 29
this section for a period exceeding twenty-four consecutive 30
months. The twenty-four-month period during which an employee or 31
official may apply begins in the month in which the employee or 32
official first applies for a reimbursement under this section. 33
No reimbursement shall exceed either of the amounts described 34
under division (E) of this section. 35
(D) For each month in which an employee or official pays 36
out of pocket to purchase a supply of a GLP-1 drug described 37
under division (B) of this section, the employee or official may 38
apply to the director of administrative services for a 39
reimbursement. The employee or official shall include in the 40
reimbursement application both of the following: 41
(1) Proof that, at the time treatment is initiated, the 42
employee's or official's body mass index is at least thirty, as 43
determined by a physician; 44
(2) The amount that the employee or official paid out of 45
pocket to purchase a supply of a GLP-1 drug described under 46
division (B) of this section. 47

H. B. No. 388 Page 3
As Introduced
(E)(1) An employee or official whom the director 48
determines is eligible for a reimbursement under this section 49
shall be reimbursed in either of the following amounts: 50
(a) For any month of the first year during which the 51
employee or official is eligible for reimbursement, not more 52
than five hundred dollars; 53
(b) For any month of the second year during which the 54
employee or official is eligible for reimbursement, an amount 55
equal to one-half of the cost the employee or official paid out 56
of pocket to purchase a supply of a GLP-1 drug described under 57
division (B) of this section, not to exceed two hundred fifty 58
dollars. 59
(2) If the director determines that an employee or 60
official is not eligible for a reimbursement in any month, the 61
employee or official shall not receive a reimbursement for that 62
month. An employee or official whom the director determines is 63
not eligible for a reimbursement in any month during the twenty- 64
four-month period described under division (C) or (F)(2) of this 65
section is not precluded from applying for a reimbursement in 66
any subsequent month during that period. 67
(F)(1) Not earlier than six months after the previous 68
twenty-four-month period during which an employee or official 69
applies for reimbursements under this section elapses, the 70
employee or official may apply to the director to seek 71
reimbursements under this section for a subsequent period not 72
exceeding twenty-four consecutive months. The employee or 73
official shall include in the application proof that, at the 74
time of application, the employee's or official's weight has 75
increased by at least twenty per cent of the total amount of 76
weight the employee or official lost during the previous twenty- 77

H. B. No. 388 Page 4
As Introduced
four-month period, measured as of the last day of that period. 78
(2) If the director determines the employee's or 79
official's weight has increased by the amount specified under 80
division (F)(1) of this section, the director shall approve the 81
employee's or official's application. An employee or official 82
whose application is approved may apply for reimbursements under 83
this section for a subsequent twenty-four-month period. 84
(3) If the director determines the employee's or 85
official's weight has not increased by the amount specified 86
under division (F)(1) of this section, the director shall not 87
approve the employee's or official's application. 88
(G) The director shall adopt rules in accordance with 89
Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement this section. 90